Idaho, session 2026, H0899.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 69, Title 39, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 69
MEDICAL ADVANCED HEALING ACT
39-6901. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Medical Advanced Healing Act" or "MAHA."
39-6902. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds and determines
that:
(1) Many Idahoans, especially veterans and first responders who have
experienced job-related trauma, suffer from post-traumatic stress dis-
order, depression, substance abuse disorder, traumatic brain injury, and
other serious conditions that may not be adequately relieved with existing
treatments;
(2) Individuals who suffer from addiction to drugs or alcohol and for
whom existing treatments are not providing relief may benefit from alterna-
tive treatments;
(3) Emerging research indicates that certain neuroplastogens may offer
meaningful benefits to individuals who suffer from certain health con-
ditions when delivered in a controlled clinical setting with appropriate
screening, supervision, and follow-up care;
(4) The national defense authorization act of 2024 allows states to
partner with the secretary of war to study medicines such as psilocybin,
MDMA, and ibogaine for treatment of serious behavioral health conditions;
and
(5) The department of war recently provided ten million dollars
($10,000,000) to study these emerging modalities.


39-6903. ESTABLISHMENT OF PILOT PROGRAM. (1) The purpose of this chap-
ter is to establish a carefully regulated pilot program housed in the depart-
ment of health and welfare.
(2) The pilot program shall be designed to provide initial access lim-
ited to veterans, first responders, and those suffering from addiction.
(3) The pilot program shall be designed to:
(a) Protect public health and safety through strong screening, profes-
sional standards, and diversion control;
(b) Improve access to emerging therapeutic options for Idaho veterans;
and
(c) Generate Idaho-specific safety outcomes data to inform future leg-
islative action.
(4) The pilot program shall be administered in a revenue-neutral man-
ner. The program shall be funded primarily through program fees and volun-
tary grants or donations and not by ongoing general fund appropriations un-
less authorized by future legislation.
(5) Participation in the pilot program shall be voluntary. Nothing in
this chapter shall be construed to require any person to participate in the
pilot program.
(6) The legislature shall retain full authority to modify, expand,
limit, or discontinue the pilot program established pursuant to this chap-
ter.
39-6904. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Approved medicine" means a neuroplastogen or entheogenic sub-
stance authorized for use in the program. Approved medicines shall be
limited to:
(a) Psilocybin;
(b) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);
(c) Ibogaine; and
(d) Such additional medicines, if any, as may be subsequently autho-
rized by the legislature.
(2) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(3) "Eligible participant" means a person who:
(a) Is twenty-one (21) years of age or older;
(b) Is a resident of Idaho;
(c) Has a qualifying condition; and
(d) Has been screened and approved for participation in the program
pursuant to department rule.
(4) "Program" means the medical advanced healing act (MAHA) pilot pro-
gram established pursuant to this chapter.
(5) "Qualifying condition" means post-traumatic stress disorder, ma-
jor depressive disorder, substance use disorder, or another serious behav-
ioral health condition identified by department rule based on clinical evi-
dence and the purposes of this chapter.
39-6905. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES -- SAFETY REQUIREMENTS -- LIMITA-
TIONS. (1) To the extent consistent with the provisions of this chapter and
federal law, it shall be lawful:
(a) To obtain, possess, store, and administer approved medicines; and


(b) For an eligible participant to possess and consume approved
medicine during a supervised administration session pursuant to de-
partment rule.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to establish minimum safety stan-
dards, including rules regarding:
(a) Screening for medical and psychiatric contraindications;
(b) Informed consent, including disclosure of material risks and al-
ternatives;
(c) Requirements for preparation and post-administration support ser-
vices;
(d) Minimum supervision requirements during administration sessions,
including emergency procedures and referral pathways for higher-level
care; and
(e) Ethical standards and professional conduct requirements to prevent
exploitation and abuse.
(3) Approved medicines shall not be dispensed to a participant unless
such participant is supervised. Unsupervised use shall be prohibited.
(4) The department shall require secure storage, inventory controls,
and recordkeeping sufficient to prevent diversion and to ensure account-
ability.
39-6906. LICENSING AND RULEMAKING. (1) The department shall promul-
gate rules to implement and administer this chapter, including rules govern-
ing:
(a) Certification and training requirements;
(b) Licensing standards, inspections, and security requirements;
(c) Sourcing, testing, packaging, labeling, tracking, and disposal of
approved medicines;
(d) Participant eligibility, screening standards, and clinical proto-
cols; and
(e) Enforcement, including grounds for denial, suspension, and revoca-
tion of licensure or certification.
(2) In developing rules, the department shall consult with stakehold-
ers. The department may coordinate with federal agencies.
(3) The department may implement the program in phases and shall pri-
oritize readiness and safety and adjust timelines by rule if necessary to
safely operate the pilot program.
39-6907. MAHA FUND. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the medical advanced healing act (MAHA) fund, which shall be administered by
the department.
(2) The department may establish reasonable fees by rule to support ad-
ministration and oversight of the program, including licensing and renewal
fees and a modest per-session program fee. All funds collected shall be de-
posited into the MAHA fund for use by the program.
(3) The department may accept payments, grants, gifts, or donations to
support the program, including to subsidize participation by veterans, pro-
vided that acceptance of such payments, grants, gifts, or donations does not
create a conflict of interest or compromise program integrity. All funds
collected shall be deposited into the MAHA fund for use by the MAHA program.


(4) Moneys in the fund shall be used only for purposes of implementing,
administering, and enforcing this chapter, subject to appropriation by the
legislature.
(5) The state treasurer shall invest the idle moneys of the MAHA fund,
and the interest earned on such investments shall be retained by the MAHA
fund.
39-6908. DATA COLLECTION AND REPORTING. (1) The department shall col-
lect de-identified program data sufficient to evaluate safety, outcomes,
and program integrity.
(2) Beginning one (1) year after the program commences services, and
annually thereafter, the department shall report to the governor and germane
committees of the legislature regarding:
(a) The number of individuals served and general characteristics of
participants;
(b) The number and types of sessions conducted;
(c) Aggregate safety outcomes;
(d) Observed changes in clinical outcomes as available and appropri-
ate; and
(e) Program finances and fees.
(3) The department's report may include recommendations for improving
or expanding the program, including any proposed statutory changes.
(4) The department's report to the legislature shall be provided pur-
suant to the provisions of sections 67-466 and 67-705, Idaho Code.
39-6909. LEGISLATIVE APPROVAL OF RULES. All rules established pur-
suant to this chapter shall be subject to legislative approval.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.